Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.030

Authority to acquire and operate stone or asphalt plants.

A city or town may also construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain, and operate works, plants and facilities for the preparation and manufacture of all stone or asphalt products or compositions or other materials which may be used in street construction or maintenance, together with the right to use them, and also fix the price of and sell such products for use in the construction of municipal improvements.

[ 1985 c 445 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.92.030. Prior: 1957 c 288 s 4; 1957 c 209 s 4; prior: 1947 c 214 s 1, part; 1933 c 163 s 1, part; 1931 c 53 s 1, part; 1923 c 173 s 1, part; 1913 c 45 s 1, part; 1909 c 150 s 1, part; 1899 c 128 s 1, part; 1897 c 112 s 1, part; 1893 c 8 s 1, part; 1890 p 520 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9488, part. Formerly RCW 80.40.030.]

NOTES:

Eminent domain by cities: Chapter 8.12 RCW.